Utah statutes.
26-6-3.5.    Reporting AIDS and HIV infection -- Anonymous testing.

(1)  Because of the nature and consequences of Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome and Human Immunodeficiency Virus infection, the department shall:

(a)  require reporting of those conditions; and

(b)  utilize contact tracing and other methods for "partner" identification and notification. The department shall, by rule, define individuals who are considered "partners" for purposes of this section.

(2) (a)  The requirements of Subsection (1) do not apply to seroprevalence and other epidemiological studies conducted by the department.

(b)  The requirements of Subsection (1) do not apply to, and anonymity shall be provided in, research studies conducted by universities or hospitals, under the authority of institutional review boards if those studies are funded in whole or in part by research grants and if anonymity is required in order to obtain the research grant or to carry out the research.

(3)  For all purposes of this chapter, Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome and Human Immunodeficiency Virus infection are considered communicable and infectious diseases.

(4)  The department may establish or allow one site or agency within the state to provide anonymous testing.

(a)  The site or agency that provides anonymous testing shall maintain accurate records regarding:

(i)  the number of HIV positive individuals that it is able to contact or inform of their condition;

(ii)  the number of HIV positive individuals who receive extensive counseling;

(iii)  how many HIV positive individuals provide verifiable information for partner notification; and

(iv)  how many cases in which partner notification is carried through.

(b)  If the information maintained under Subsection (4)(a) indicates anonymous testing is not resulting in partner notification, the department shall phase out the anonymous testing program allowed by this Subsection (4).

